New Jersey, session 221, S4193.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 66 DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 80 Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights 1350 Division on Civil Rights DIRECT STATE SERVICES 16-1350  Division on Civil Rights ...................................... $3,000,000 Total Direct State Services: Appropriation, Protection of Civil Rights ................................ $3,000,000 Direct State Services: 16    Special Purpose,.................................... ($3,000,000) New Jersey Bias Investigation Access System (NJ BIAS) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Bias Investigation Access System (NJ BIAS) shall be utilized to update system upgrades.  Any unexpended balance at the end of the fiscal year is to be carried forward and appropriated for the same purpose. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.